Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER 551E]

UNIFORM POWER OF ATTORNEY ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

551E-1
Definitions

551E-2
Applicability

551E-3
Power of attorney

551E-4
Nomination of conservator or guardian; relation

of
agent to court-appointed fiduciary

551E-5
Effective date of power of attorney

551E-6
Termination of power of attorney or agent's

authority

551E-7
Co-agents and successor agents

551E-8
Reimbursement and compensation of agent

551E-9
Agent's acceptance

551E-10
Agent's duties

551E-11
Exoneration of agent

551E-12
Judicial relief

551E-13
Agent's liability

551E-14
Agent's resignation; notice

551E-15
Acceptance of and reliance upon acknowledged

power of attorney

551E-16
Liability for refusal to accept acknowledged

power of attorney

551E-17
Principles of law and equity

551E-18
Laws applicable to financial institutions and

entities

551E-19
Remedies under other law

Part II. Authority

551E-31
Authority that requires specific grant; grant of

general authority

551E-32
Incorporation of authority

551E-33
Construction of authority generally

551E-34
Real property

551E-35
Tangible personal property

551E-36
Stocks and bonds

551E-37
Commodities and options

551E-38
Banks and other financial institutions

551E-39
Operation of entity or business

551E-40
Insurance and annuities

551E-41
Estates, trusts, and other beneficial interests

551E-42
Claims and litigation

551E-43
Personal and family maintenance

551E-44
Benefits from governmental programs or civil or

military service

551E-45
Retirement plans

551E-46
Taxes

551E-47
Gifts

Part III. Statutory Forms

551E-51
Statutory form power of attorney

551E-52
Agent's certification

Part IV. Miscellaneous Provisions

551E-61
Uniformity of application and construction

551E-62
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and

National Commerce Act

551E-63
Effect on existing powers of attorney

Law Journals and
Reviews

Prior law.

The Death Of The
Living Will And The Making Of Health Care Decisions Under Hawaii's New But Not
Quite Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act. III HBJ, no. 13, at 29 (1999).

Consent for Testing
and Treatment of Minors in Hawaii. 13 HBJ, no. 13, at 165 (2009).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next